Utah statutes.
78B-15-604.   Personal jurisdiction.

(1)  An individual may not be adjudicated to be a parent unless the tribunal has personal jurisdiction over the individual.

(2)  A tribunal of this state having jurisdiction to adjudicate parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual, or the guardian or conservator of the individual, if the conditions prescribed in Section 78B-14-201 are fulfilled, or the individual has signed a declaration of paternity.

(3)  Lack of jurisdiction over one individual does not preclude the tribunal from making an adjudication of parentage binding on another individual over whom the tribunal has personal jurisdiction.

